Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.53
Continuing education and training; licensee; requirements.

Except for inactive licensees, the commission shall not renew a license
or issue a new license to any licensee who has failed to comply with the requirements
of sections 81-885.49 to 81-885.54. Inactive licensees may renew their licenses
at the end of the two-year period without having completed the hours of continuing
education and training activities
required by section 81-885.51 for each two-year period. Inactive licensees
shall not be activated until the licensee has satisfactorily completed the
total number of deficient hours of continuing education activities and filed
evidence of such completion with the commission, except that no inactive licensee
shall be required to make up more than the number of hours of continuing education
required by section 81-885.51 for a two-year period.

Laws 1985, LB 101, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 27;

Laws 2011, LB24, § 4.